en: Frozen cakes and pastries, frozen cakes, frozen pastries
de: Tiefkühlgebäck
fi: Pakastekakut ja -leivonnaiset
fr: Gâteaux et pâtisseries surgelés, gâteaux surgelés, pâtisseries surgelées, desserts pâtissiers surgelés, Gâteaux et pâtisseries surgelées
hr: Smrznuti kolači i kolači
it: Torte e pasticcini congelati
lt: Šaldyti tortai ir pyragaičiai, šaldyti pyragaičiai
nl: Diepvriesgebak

en: Mochi ice cream
es: Helado de mochi
fr: Mochi glacés
hr: Mochi sladoled
ja: 餅アイス, もちアイス
lt: Mochi ledai

en: Iced nougat
fr: Nougat glacé

fr: Viennoiseries surgelées
nl: Diepvriesbroden

fr: Croissants surgelés
nl: Diepvriescroissants

fr: Pains au chocolat surgelés, chocolatines surgelées, petits-pains au chocolat surgelés
nl: Diepvries-chocoladecroissants

en: Frozen salty snacks
fr: Snacks salés surgelés

en: Frozen snacks and starters
fr: Entrées et snacks surgelés, Snacks et entrées surgelés
hr: Smrznute grickalice i predjela
lt: Šaldyti užkandžiai
nl: Diepvriesvoorgerechten

en: Frozen pizzas and pies
bg: Замразена пица и пай
ca: Pastissos i pizzes congelades
de: Gefrorene Pizzas und Quiches
es: Pizza y tartas congeladas
fi: pakastetut pizzat ja piiraat
fr: Pizzas et tartes surgelées
hr: Smrznute pizze i pite
hu: Fagyasztott pizzák és piték
it: Pizze e torte surgelate
lt: Šaldytos picos ir pyragai
nl: Diepvriespizzas en -taarten
pl: Pizza i ciasta mrożone
pt: Pizzas e tortas congeladas
sv: Frysta pizzor och pajer, Fryst pizza och paj

en: Frozen pizzas
bg: Замразена пица
de: Tiefkühlpizza
es: Pizzas congeladas
fi: pakastetut pizzat
fr: Pizzas surgelées, pizza surgelée
he: פיצות קפואות
hr: Smrznute pizze
hu: Mirelit pizzák
it: Pizza surgelata
ja: 冷凍ピザ
lt: Šaldytos picos
nl: Diepvriespizzas
pl: Pizza mrożona
pt: Pizzas congeladas
ru: Замороженая пицца
sv: Frysta Pizzor, Fryst Pizza
tr: Dondurulmuş pizza

en: Frozen pies
de: Tiefkühlkuchen
es: Tartas saladas congeladas, tartas congeladas
fi: pakastetut piiraat
fr: Tartes salées surgelées, Tartes surgelées, tarte surgelée
hr: Smrznute pite
lt: Šaldyti pyragai
nl: Diepvries hartige taarten

en: Frozen quiches
fr: Quiches surgelées, Quiches salées surgelées

en: Frozen ready-made meals, Frozen prepared meals, Frozen prepared dishes, Frozen dinners
bg: Готови замразени ястия
ca: Plats preparats congelats, menjars preparats congelats, plats preparats congelats, sopars congelats
de: Gefrorene Fertigmahlzeiten, Gefrorene vorgekochte Mahlzeiten
es: Comidas preparadas congeladas, Platos preparados congelados
fi: Pakastetut valmisateriat
fr: Plats préparés surgelés, plat préparé surgelé, Plats surgelés, Plat surgelé, Plats cuisinés surgelés
hr: Smrznuta gotova jela
hu: Fagyasztott készételek
it: Piatti pronti surgelati
nl: Diepvriesmaaltijden
pl: Mrożone dania gotowe
pt: Refeições prontas a comer congeladas
ru: Замороженные готовые обеды

en: Frozen fishes
bg: Замразена риба
de: Tiefkühlfisch, Tiefkühl-Fisch
es: Pescado congelado
fi: kalapakasteet
fr: Poissons surgelés
hr: Smrznute ribe
it: Pesci surgelati
lt: Šaldytos žuvys
nl: Diepvriesvis
pl: Ryby mrożone
pt: Peixes congelados
ru: Замороженая рыба

en: Frozen fish fillets
fr: Filets de poisson surgelés

en: Saithe
fr: Lieu noir
hr: Saja
lt: Ledjūrio menkės

en: Frozen saithe
fr: Lieu noir surgelé
hr: Smrznuta saie
lt: Šaldytos ledjūrio menkės

en: Saithe cooked
fr: Lieu noir cuit
hr: Saja kuhana
lt: Keptos ledjūrio menkės

en: Arctic char
fr: Omble chevalier

en: Frozen meats
bg: Замразено месо
de: Tiefkühl-Fleisch
es: Carnes congeladas
fi: lihapakasteet
fr: Viandes surgelées
hr: Smrznuto meso
it: Carne surgelata
ja: 冷凍肉
ko: 냉동 육류
lt: Šaldytos mėsos
nl: Diepvries vlees
pl: Mięso mrożone
pt: Carnes congeladas
ru: Замороженное мясо
sv: Fryst kött
tr: Dondurulmuş et
zh: 冷冻肉类